Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB405.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.603 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A local[No school district] board of education shall comply with subsections (2) to
(5) of this section prior to:
(a) Levying[levy] any of the school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593 to 160.597,
160.601 to 160.633, and 160.635 to 160.648, except the levy required by KRS
160.614(3) and (6); or[,]
(b) Increasing the school tax rate as authorized by subsection (2) of Section 2
of this Act.
(2) To propose a levy or increase of a tax under subsection (1) of this section, a
favorable vote of the local board of education is required prior to taking any
other action to levy or increase the tax. Prior to the vote, the date, time, and place
of the meeting in which the vote is expected to occur shall be published for at
least two (2) consecutive weeks on the home page of the local board of
education's website.[ until after compliance with the following:]
(3)[(1)] The local[school district] board of education desiring to levy any one (1) of
the[these] taxes referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this section, or to increase the
school tax rate as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, shall give notice of
any proposed levy or increase[of one (1) of the school taxes]. Notwithstanding any
statutory provisions to the contrary, notice shall be given by causing to be published
for at least two (2) consecutive weeks, on the home page of the school district's
website and[ at least one (1) time] in a newspaper of general circulation published
in the county or by posting at the courthouse door if there be no such newspaper,
the fact that the[such] levy or increase is being proposed. The advertisement shall
state:
(a) An explanation of the school tax and who it is imposed upon;
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 156
(b) The current school tax rate levied and revenue generated from the levy in
the preceding year;
(c) The proposed school tax rate levy and the expected revenue to be generated
from the levy;
(d) The need for the levy and expected use of the funds generated from the levy;
(e) The date, time, and place for the public hearing, which shall be held[that the
district board of education will meet at a place and on a day fixed in the
advertisement,] not earlier than one (1) week and not later than two (2) weeks
from the date of the advertisement;
(f) A statement that[, for] the purposes[purpose] of the public hearing are:
1. To listen to comments and concerns[complaints] regarding the proposed
school tax levy or school tax rate increase; and
2. For the local board of education to provide information and explain
the reasoning[explaining the reasons] for the[such] proposal; and
(g) A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required publication
of the advertisement and the information contained in it.
(4)[(2)] The local[school district] board of education shall conduct a public hearing at
the place and on the date advertised for the purposes stated in subsection (3) of this
section[purpose of hearing comments and complaints regarding the proposed levy
and explaining the reasons for such proposal].
(5)[(3)] In the event that a combined taxing district desires to levy any one (1) of
the[these] taxes referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the boards of
education shall make a joint advertisement and hold a joint hearing in the manner
prescribed in this section[heretofore] for an individual school district.
Section 2. KRS 160.607 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The school tax authorized by KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 shall be at a
single uniform rate not to exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) and shall continue
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 156
from year to year until changed as prescribed in KRS 160.635 and 160.484.
(2) After complying with Section 1 of this Act and receiving a favorable vote by the
fiscal court as required by Section 3 of this Act, any county having three hundred
thousand (300,000) or more inhabitants is authorized to increase the school tax rate
to exceed the maximum rate set in subsection (1) of this section by one-quarter of
one percent (0.25%).
Section 3. KRS 160.484 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to[(2), (3), and] (4) of this section, the fiscal
court has discretion to impose or not impose the license fees authorized by KRS
160.482 to 160.488 at a percentage rate, not to exceed one-half of one percent
(0.5%), determined by the fiscal court. A fiscal court shall not proceed under this
subsection without first giving all boards of education in the county thirty (30) days
notice of its intention.
(2) If one (1) or more boards of education of school districts within the county which
contain at least ninety percent (90%) of county's inhabitants, in the same calendar
year certify to the fiscal court requests for a license fee at an identical percentage
rate, not to exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%), then the fiscal court shall impose
such license fees at the requested rate.
(3) Any license fees imposed under subsection[subsections] (1) or (2) of this section
shall remain in full effect from year to year until all boards of education within the
county have certified to the fiscal court requests for a reduction in the percentage
rate[ theretofore] imposed. Thereafter, the fiscal court shall reduce the rate to the
highest rate certified as yet necessary by any board of education in the county. The
fiscal court may require each board of education to make no more than one (1)
certificate annually.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, in any calendar year in which
one (1) or more boards of education of school districts containing at least ninety
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 156
percent (90%) of the county's inhabitants make a certification pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section for a rate which is at a higher percentage than any
currently imposed, the fiscal court shall impose the license fee at the higher rate and
any rate imposed pursuant to subsection[subsections] (1), (2), or (3) of this section
shall be rescinded upon the date the new rate takes effect.
(5) In any calendar year in which a board of education proposes to increase the
school tax rate as authorized by subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act, the fiscal
court shall vote on the proposed rate increase. If the proposed rate increase
receives a favorable vote, the fiscal court shall impose the higher rate and any
rate imposed pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section shall be
rescinded upon the date the new rate takes effect. If the proposed rate increase
does not receive a favorable vote, the higher rate shall not go into effect and any
rate imposed pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section shall remain in
full effect.
Section 4. KRS 160.485 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The imposition of license fees authorized by KRS 160.482 to 160.488[hereby] shall
be by order or resolution of the fiscal court. There shall be no more than one (1)
order or resolution passed in any one (1) calendar year. In the case of license fees
required to be imposed pursuant to[ subsection (2) of] KRS 160.484(2), the fiscal
court shall make the order or resolution within ten (10) days following receipt of the
first request which[ makes subsection (2) of] KRS 160.484(2) effective.
(2) (a) The order or resolution of the fiscal court imposing license fees pursuant to[
subsections (1), (2), or (4) of] KRS 160.484(1), (2), (4), or (5) shall go into
effect forty-five (45) days after its passage.
(b) During the forty-five (45) days next following the passage of the order or
resolution, any five (5) qualified voters who reside in the county may
commence petition proceedings to protest the passage of the order or
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 156
resolution by filing with the county clerk an affidavit stating that they
constitute the petition committee and that they will be responsible for
circulating the petition and filing it in the proper form within forty-five (45)
days from the passage of the order or resolution. The affidavit shall state their
names and addresses and specify the address to which all notices to the
committee are to be sent. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall:
1. At the time of filing of the affidavit, notify the petition committee of all
statutory requirements for the filing of a valid petition under this
section;
2. At the time of the filing of the affidavit, notify the petition committee
that the clerk will publish a notice identifying the tax levy being
challenged and providing the names and addresses of the petition
committee in a newspaper of general circulation within the county, if
such publication exists, if the petition committee remits an amount equal
to the cost of publishing the notice determined in accordance with the
provisions of KRS 424.160 at the time of the filing of the affidavit. If
the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk shall
publish the notice within five (5) days of receipt of the affidavit; and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the fiscal court and the impacted
school districts.
(c) The petition shall be filed with the county clerk within forty-five (45) days of
the passage of the order or resolution. All papers of the petition shall be
uniform in size and style and shall be assembled in one (1) instrument for
filing. Each sheet of the petition shall contain the names of voters from one
(1) voting precinct only, and shall include the name, number and designation
of the precinct in which the voters signing the petition live. The inclusion of
an invalid signature on a page shall not invalidate the entire page of the
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 156
petition, but shall instead result in the invalid signature being stricken and not
counted. Each signature shall be executed in ink or indelible pencil and shall
be followed by the printed name, street address, and Social Security number
or birthdate of the person signing. The petition shall be signed by a number of
registered and qualified voters residing in the affected jurisdiction equal to at
least ten percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last preceding
presidential election.
(d) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the order or resolution
shall be suspended until after the election referred to in subsection (3) of this
section is held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient and
no further action may be taken pursuant to paragraph (h) of this subsection.
(e) The clerk shall immediately notify the fiscal court and the impacted school
districts that the petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days of
the receipt of the petition, make a determination of whether the petition
contains enough signatures of qualified voters to place the order or resolution
before the voters.
(f) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to
the petition committee, the fiscal court, and the impacted school boards within
the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection that
the petition is properly presented and in compliance with the provisions of this
section, and that the order or resolution levying the tax will be placed before
the voters for approval.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within
the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection,
notify, in writing, the petition committee, the fiscal court and the impacted
school districts of the specific deficiencies found. Notification shall be sent by
certified mail and shall be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 156
general circulation within the county or, if there is no such newspaper, shall
be posted at the courthouse door.
(h) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final
review by the Circuit Court of the county and shall be limited to the validity
of the county clerk's determination. Any petition challenging the county
clerk's final determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the issuance of
the clerk's final determination.
(3) Upon validation of the petition, the fiscal court shall submit to the voters of the
county at the next regular election or called common school district election, which
shall be held not less than thirty-five (35) days nor more than forty-five (45) days
from the date the signatures on the petition are validated by the county clerk, the
question as to whether the license fees for common school purposes shall be levied.
Any called common school election shall comply with the provisions of KRS
118.025. If the election is held in conjunction with a regular election, the question
shall be submitted to the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August
preceding the regular election. The question shall be so framed that the voter may
by his vote answer, "for" or "against." If a majority of the votes cast upon the
question oppose its passage, the order or resolution shall not go into effect. If a
majority of the votes cast upon the question favor its passage, the order or
resolution shall go into effect.
(4) License fees imposed pursuant to KRS 160.482 to 160.488 shall become effective
on the date specified in the order or resolution, but no later than the first day of the
calendar year first beginning after the day the order or resolution is made.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:19 PM Jacketed